test/src/morphology/V-ehitellemae52_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ehite(l)lemä: # Verb (52) ehite(l)lemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ehite(l)lemä+V+Inf/mA: [ehitellemä, ehitelemä]
     ehite(l)lemä+V+Inf: ehitelläq
     ehite(l)lemä+V+ActPrtPrc: ehitelnüq
     ehite(l)lemä+V+PssPrtPrc: ehiteld
     ehite(l)lemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: [ehitelle, ehitele]
     ehite(l)lemä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: [ehitelles, ehiteles]
     ehite(l)lemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [ehitelli, ehiteli]
     ehite(l)lemä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [ehitelli, ehiteli]
